New Jersey, session 222, A2712.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The legislature finds and declares that: a. With over 125 miles of coastline in New Jersey, traveling to the Jersey Shore has become a part of family traditions for many New Jersey residents and tourists for generations. b. Created in Atlantic City in the 1880s, salt water taffy has been enjoyed for over 125 years by visitors to the New Jersey coastline and the State. c. According to local legend, the treat was created after salt water from an evening storm flooded the candy shop and damaged the taffy supply of candy maker David Bradley, who, at the request of a persistent customer, sold the first salt water taffy and made the accidental creation a household name. d. Throughout the late 1800s and early 1900s, with the development of shore communities, such as Atlantic City and Ocean City, confectioners Enoch James, Joseph Fralinger, and William Shriver came to dominate the salt water taffy industry along the boardwalks of the Jersey Shore.  The 1928 opening of Jenkinsons Pavilion reflected a northward growth, transforming the Point Pleasant Beach boardwalk with a landmark candy shop where salt water taffy became a centerpiece attraction. e. As New Jersey is widely recognized as the home and birthplace of the salt water taffy, it serves as the ideal symbol for the official State candy. 2.    The salt water taffy is designated as the New Jersey State Candy. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.